North Carolina, session 2025, SB210.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Durham County to be used to enhance
and upgrade County wastewater utility infrastructure in the Research Triangle Park area to
support economic development and growth.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S210-v-1*